Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.476

Dissenters' rights—Notice—Timing.

(1) Not less than ten days prior to the approval of a plan of merger, the limited liability company must send a written notice to all members who are entitled to vote on or approve the plan of merger that they may be entitled to assert dissenters' rights under this article. Such notice shall be accompanied by a copy of this article.

(2) The limited liability company must notify in writing all members not entitled to vote on or approve the plan of merger that the plan of merger was approved, and send them the dissenters' notice as required by RCW 25.15.486.

[ 2015 c 188 s 91.]